Idaho, session 2025, S1195.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Tax Commission the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. GENERAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $330,000 $542,600 $95,900 $968,500
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 26,700 33,000 59,700
Administration and Accounting
Fund 3,900 44,500 48,400
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 22,700 99,000 121,700
Seminars and Publications
Fund 0 0 165,000 165,000
TOTAL $330,000 $595,900 $437,400 $1,363,300
II. AUDIT DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $79,000 $47,700 $126,700
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 2,300 2,300


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 0 13,200 13,200
TOTAL $79,000 $63,200 $142,200
III. COMPLIANCE DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $70,500 $39,900 $110,400
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 0 2,200 2,200
TOTAL $70,500 $42,100 $112,600
IV. REVENUE OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $70,500 $18,100 $88,600
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 0 1,400 1,400
TOTAL $70,500 $19,500 $90,000
V. PROPERTY TAX:
FROM:
General
Fund $43,800 $37,700 $81,500
GRAND TOTAL $550,000 $764,500 $475,100 $1,789,600
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the State Tax Commission is increased by seven (7.00) for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. ADDITIONAL POSITIONS. Of the additional full-time equiva-
lent positions authorized in Section 2 of this act, it is the intent of the
Legislature that two of the positions be limited service positions with a
service term of no longer than two years, and that the agency's budget re-
quest for fiscal year 2028 reflect their removal from the base appropria-
tion. The positions shall support the implementation of the new parental
choice tax credit program pursuant to Section 63-3029N, Idaho Code.


SECTION 4. TAX CREDIT ADMINISTRATION. Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, the amount available in Section 63-3029N, Idaho Code, for Idaho
parental choice tax credits shall be reduced by $675,000 to implement the ad-
ministration of the tax credit.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.